lt-LT: Tvirtinimo kabliuko ir kilpos šonas: Kabliukų ir kilpučių rinkinys (abi pusės); Tik kabliukų pusė; Tik kilpučių pusė; Kita
th: ด้านตีนตุ๊กแก: ชุดตะขอและห่วง (ทั้งสองด้าน); ด้านตะขอเท่านั้น; ด้านห่วงเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Страна на велкро закопчаването: Комплект кукички и примки (двете страни); Само страна с кукички; Само страна с примки; Друго
fi: Tarranauhan kiinnityspuoli: Tarranauhasarja (molemmat puolet); Vain koukkupuoli; Vain lenkkipuoli; Muu
pt-BR: Lado do fecho de contato (gancho ou argola): Conjunto de fecho de contato (ambos os lados); Apenas o lado do gancho; Apenas o lado da argola; Outros
nb: Festeside for borrelås: Borrelåssett (begge sider); Kun krok-side; Kun løkke-side; Annet
ja: フックとループファスナーサイド: 面ファスナーセット (両面); フック面のみ; ループ面のみ; その他
sl-SI: Stran sprijemalnega traku: Set kaveljčkov in zank (obe strani); Samo stran s kaveljčki; Samo stran z zankami; Drugo
pl: Strona z zapięciem na rzep: Zestaw rzepów (obie strony); Tylko strona z haczykami; Tylko strona z pętelkami; Inna
es: Lado del cierre de velcro: Juego de gancho y bucle (ambos lados); Solo lado del gancho; Solo lado del bucle; Otro
cs: Strana se suchým zipem: Sada suchého zipu (obě strany); Pouze s háčky; Pouze se smyčkami; Jiné
hu: Tépőzáras rögzítő oldala: Tépőzárkészlet (mindkét oldal); Csak horgos oldal; Csak hurkos oldal; Egyéb
fr: Côté velcro: Ensemble crochets et boucles (les deux côtés); Côté crochets uniquement; Côté boucles uniquement; Autre
de: Seite des Klettverschlusses: Klettverschluss-Set (beide Seiten); Nur Hakenseite; Nur Flauschseite; Andere
it: Lato del fissaggio in velcro: Set chiusura a strappo (entrambi i lati); Solo lato uncino; Solo lato asola; Altro
sk-SK: Strana so suchým zipsom: Súprava háčikov a slučiek (obe strany); Iba strana s háčikmi; Iba strana so slučkami; Iné
pt-PT: Lado com gancho e laço: Conjunto de gancho e laço (ambos os lados); Apenas o lado do gancho; Apenas o lado do laço; Outro
nl: Zijde van klittenbandsluiting: Klittenbandset (beide zijden); Alleen haakkant; Alleen luskant; Overig
da: Fastgørelsesside for burrelukning: Burrebåndssæt (begge sider); Kun krogside; Kun løkkeside; Andet
sv: Kardborresida: Kardborreset (båda sidor); Endast kroksida; Endast öglesida; Annat
zh-CN: 粘扣带/魔术贴面: 魔术贴套装（双面）; 仅勾面; 仅毛面; 其他
hr-HR: Strana čičak zatvarača: Komplet s čičak-trakom (obje strane); Samo strana s kukicama; Samo strana s petljama; Ostalo
vi: Mặt của băng gai dính: Bộ gai dính (cả hai mặt); Chỉ mặt gai; Chỉ mặt lông; Khác
ro-RO: Partea sistemului de prindere cu velcro: Set cu scai (ambele părți); Doar partea cu cârlige; Doar partea cu bucle; Altele
zh-TW: 魔鬼氈面: 鉤環組 (雙面); 僅鉤面; 僅毛面/環面; 其他
ko: 벨크로(찍찍이) 테이프면: 훅 앤 루프 세트(양면); 훅 면 전용; 루프 면 전용; 기타
ru: Сторона текстильной застежки: Крючки и петли (обе стороны); Только сторона с крючками; Только сторона с петлями; Другое
tr: Cırt cırtlı bağlantı tarafı: Cırt cırt seti (her iki taraf); Sadece kanca tarafı; Sadece halka tarafı; Diğer
el: Πλευρά κλεισίματος hook and loop: Σετ hook and loop (και οι δύο πλευρές); Μόνο η πλευρά με γαντζάκια; Μόνο η πλευρά με θηλιές; Άλλο
en: Hook and loop fastener side: Hook and loop set (both sides); Hook side only; Loop side only; Other